Florida, session 2026, SB1094.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 61 62 Section 1.âThe facts stated in the preamble to this act are 63 found and declared to be true. 64 Section 2.âThe Orange County Sheriffâs Office is authorized 65 and directed to appropriate from funds of the county not 66 otherwise appropriated or encumbered and to draw a warrant in 67 the sum of $20,721,629.23 plus interest payable to Sean Hurley 68 as compensation for injuries and damages sustained due to the 69 negligence of the Orange County Sheriffâs Office. 70 Section 3.âThe amount paid by the Orange County Sheriffâs 71 Office pursuant to s. 768.28, Florida Statutes, and the amount 72 awarded under this act are intended to provide the sole 73 compensation for all present and future claims arising out of 74 the factual situation described in this act which resulted in 75 injuries and damages to Sean Hurley. The total amount paid for 76 attorney fees relating to this claim may not exceed 25 percent 77 of the total amount awarded under this act. 78 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.